Hawaii statutes.
§516-68 Rights to self-organization;
remedies. Lessees in a development tract shall have the right of
self-organization and the right to form, join, or assist each other in forming
associations for their mutual benefit or to select representatives of their
choosing to engage in bargaining with their lessor or to secure other mutual
aid or protection as may be necessary or desirable with respect to their
respective leasehold interests. No lessor or agent of the lessor shall
interfere with, restrain, or coerce any lessee in the exercise of the rights
granted by this section or dominate or attempt to control the formation of any
such organization. Neither the lessor nor the organization or the duly
authorized representative of a majority of the lessees shall refuse to bargain
collectively in good faith with each other. In the event of any such refusal
or violation of this section, either party may file a complaint with the Hawaii
housing finance and development corporation, and the corporation, after due notice
of hearing and hearings, may issue such cease and desist orders as shall be
meet and just in the light of the evidence adduced. [L 1967, c 307, §41; HRS
§516-68; am L 1987, c 337, §16; am L 1988, c 104, §2; am L 1997, c 350, §14; am
L 2005, c 196, §26(b); am L 2006, c 180, §16]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next